Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-510
Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, districts; terms; nonpartisan ballot.

The State of Nebraska is divided into eight districts for the election of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska as provided and described in sections 85-103.01 and 85-103.02. One regent from district number one and one regent from district number two shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1996 and each six years thereafter. One regent from district number six and one regent from district number seven shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1992 and each six years thereafter. One regent from district number three, one regent from district number four, one regent from district number five, and one regent from district number eight shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1994 and each six years thereafter. The regents shall serve for terms of six years or until their successors are elected and qualified. The regents shall be elected on the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 106;

Laws 2001, LB 854, § 1.